incubator/apertium-ru-cu/apertium-ru-cu.ru.dix
    <!-- [m.4b/ani] бомж__n -->
    <pardef n="бомж__n">
      <e c="m.4b/ani">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е`</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у`</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о`м</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и`</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е`й</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е`й</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`х</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`м</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а`ми</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [m.5*а/ani] американ/ец__n -->
    <pardef n="американ/ец__n">
      <e c="m.5*а/ani">
        <p>
          <l>ец</l>
          <r><s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ца</l>
          <r>ец<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ца</l>
          <r>ец<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>це</l>
          <r>ец<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цу</l>
          <r>ец<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цем</l>
          <r>ец<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цы</l>
          <r>ец<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цев</l>
          <r>ец<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цев</l>
          <r>ец<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цах</l>
          <r>ец<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цам</l>
          <r>ец<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>цами</l>
          <r>ец<s n="ani"/><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [f.3a] фабрик/а__n -->
    <pardef n="фабрик/а__n">
      <e c="f.3a">
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ой</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ою</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ами</l>
          <r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- [f.8e^] мат/ь__n -->
    <pardef n="мат/ь__n">
      <e c="f.8e^">
        <p>
          <l>ь</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ь</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ери</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ери</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ери</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ерью</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ери</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ере`й</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ере`й</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еря`х</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еря`м</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еря`ми</l>
          <r>ь<s n="n"/><s n="ani"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="бомж"><i>бо'мж</i><par n="бомж__n"/></e>
    <e lm="американец"><i>америка'н</i><par n="американ/ец__n"/></e>
    <e lm="беженец"><i>бе'жен</i><par n="американ/ец__n"/></e>
    <e lm="владелец"><i>владе'лец</i><par n="американ/ец__n"/></e>
    <e lm="фабрика"><i>фа'брик</i><par n="фабрик/а__n"/></e>
    <e lm="мать"><i>ма'т</i><par n="мат/ь__n"/></e>
